en: E359, ammonium adipate
xx: E359
bg: E359, Амониев адипат
cs: E359, Amoniový adipát
da: E359, Ammoniumadipat
de: E359, Ammoniumadipat
el: E359, Αμμωνιο αδιπικο
es: E359, Adipato de amonio
et: E359, Ammooniumadipaat
fi: E359, Ammoniumadipaatti, Ammoniumadipaattia
fr: E359, Adipates d'ammonium
hu: E359, Ammónium-adipát
it: E359, Adipato di ammonio
lt: E359, Amonio adipatas
lv: E359, Amonija adipināts
mt: E359, Adipat tal-ammonju
nl: E359, Ammoniumadipaat
pl: E359, Adypinian amonu
pt: E359, Adipato de amónio
ro: E359, Adipat de amoniu
sk: E359, Amoniový adipát
sl: E359, Amonijev adipat
sv: E359, Ammoniumadipat

en: E363, Succinic acid, Asuccin, Amber acid, 1/2-Ethanedicarboxylic acid, Butanedioic acid, Bernsteinsaeure, Ethylenesuccinic acid, Spirit of amber, Butanedionic acid, Bernsteinsaure, Succinate, Butandisaeure, Dihydrofumaric acid, Acidum succinicum, Acide butanedioique, Acide succinique
xx: E363
bg: E363, Сукцинова киселина, Янтарна киселина, Бискарбоксиметил, Бутандиова киселина
ca: E363, Àcid succínic, acid succinic
cs: E363, Kyselina jantarová
da: E363, Ravsyre, Succinat
de: E363, Bernsteinsäure, 1/4-Butandisäure, Succinylsäure, Butandisäure
el: E363, Ηλεκτρικο οξυ
es: E363, Ácido succínico, Ácido butanodioico, Succinato
et: E363, Merevaikhape
fi: E363, Meripihkahappo, Butaanidikarbonihappo, Butaanidihappo, Sukkiinihappo, Meripihkahappoa, Butaanidikarbonihappoa, Butaanidihappoa, Sukkiinihappoa
fr: E363, Acide succinique, Succinate, Acide butanedioïque
hu: E363, Borostyánkősav
it: E363, Acido succinico, Succinato, Acido 1/4-butandioico
lt: E363, Gintaro rūgštis
lv: E363, Dzintarskābe, Butāndiskābe, Sukcināts, Etāndikarbonskābe
mt: E363, Aċidu suċċiniku
nl: E363, Barnsteenzuur, Succinyl, Succinaat, Butaandizuur
pl: E363, Kwas bursztynowy, Bursztynian
pt: E363, Ácido succínico, Succinato, Ácido butanodióico
ro: E363, Acid succinic
sk: E363, Kyselina jantárová
sl: E363, Jantarna kislina
sv: E363, Bärnstenssyra, Bärnstensyra, Bernstenssyra

en: E364(i), Monosodium succinate
xx: E364(i)

en: E364(ii), Disodium succinate
xx: E364(ii)

en: E364, Sodium succinates
xx: E364
ar: E364, سكسينات الصوديوم
az: E364, Natrium süksinat
bg: E364, Натриев сукцинат
ca: E364, Succinat de sodi
cs: E364, Natrium sukcinát
da: E364, Natriumsukcinat
de: E364, Natriumsuccinat
el: E364, Ηλεκτρικό νάτριο
eo: E364, Natria sukcinato
es: E364, Succinato de sodio
et: E364, Naatrium suktsinaat
fa: E364, سدیم سوکسینات
fi: E364, Natriumsukkinaatti, Natriumsukkinaattia
fr: E364, Succinates de sodium, Succinate monosodique, Succinate disodique
he: E364, נתרן סוקסינאט
hi: E364, सोडियम सक्सीनेट
hr: E364, Natrijev sukcinat
hu: E364, Nátrium-szukcinát
id: E364, Natrium suksinat
it: E364, Succinato di sodio
ja: E364, コハク酸ナトリウム
ko: E364, 숙신산 나트륨
lt: E364, Natrio sukcinatas
lv: E364, Nātrija sukcināts
mk: E364, Натриум сукцинат
mt: E364, Suċċinat tas-sodju
nl: E364, Natriumsuccinaat
no: E364, Natriumsuccinat
pl: E364, Bursztynian sodu
pt: E364, Succinato de sódio
ro: E364, Succinat de sodiu
ru: E364, Сукцинат натрия
sk: E364, Sukcinát sodný
sl: E364, Natrijev sukcinat
sr: E364, Натријум сукцинат
sv: E364, Natriumsuccinat
th: E364, โซเดียมซัคซิเนต
tr: E364, Sodyum süksinat
uk: E364, Сукцинат натрію
vi: E364, Natri succinat
zh: E364, 琥珀酸钠

en: E365, Sodium fumarate
xx: E365
bg: E365, Натриев фумарат
cs: E365, Sodný fumarát
da: E365, Natriumfumarat
de: E365, Natriumfumarat
el: E365, Φουμαρικό νάτριο
es: E365, Fumarato de sodio
et: E365, Naatriumfumaraat
fi: E365, Natriumfumaraatti, Natriumfumaraattia
fr: E365, Fumarate de sodium
hu: E365, Nátrium-fumarát
it: E365, Fumarato di sodio
lt: E365, Natrio fumaratas
lv: E365, Nātrija fumarāts
mt: E365, Fumarat tas-sodju
nl: E365, Natriumfumaraat
pl: E365, Fumaran sodu
pt: E365, Fumarato de sódio
ro: E365, Fumarat de sodiu
sk: E365, Sodný fumarát
sl: E365, Natrijev fumarat
sv: E365, Natriumfumarat

en: E366, Potassium fumarate
xx: E366
bg: E366, Калиев фумарат
cs: E366, Fumarát draselný
da: E366, Kaliumfumarat
de: E366, Kaliumfumarat
el: E366, Φουμαρικό κάλιο
es: E366, Fumarato de potasio, Fumarato potásico, E 366
et: E366, Kaaliumfumaraat
fi: E366, Kaliumfumaraatti, Kaliumfumaraattia
fr: E366, Fumarate de potassium
hu: E366, Kálium-fumarát
it: E366, Fumarato di potassio
lt: E366, Kalio fumaratas
lv: E366, Kālija fumarāts
mt: E366, Fumarat tal-potassju
nl: E366, Kaliumfumaraat
pl: E366, Fumaran potasu
pt: E366, Fumarato de potássio
ro: E366, Fumarat de potasiu
sk: E366, Fumarát draselný
sl: E366, Kalijev fumarat
sv: E366, Kaliumfumarat

en: E367, Calcium fumarate
xx: E367
bg: E367, Калциев фумарат
cs: E367, Kalcium fumarát
da: E367, Calciumfumarat
de: E367, Calciumfumarat
el: E367, Φουμαρικό ασβέστιο
es: E367, Fumarato de calcio, Fumarato cálcico, E 367
et: E367, Kaltsiumfumaraat
fi: E367, Kalsiumfumaraatti, Kalsiumfumaraattia
fr: E367, Fumarate de calcium
hu: E367, Kalcium-fumarát
it: E367, Fumarato di calcio
lt: E367, Kalcio fumaratas
lv: E367, Kalcija fumarāts
mt: E367, Fumarat tal-kalċju
nl: E367, Calciumfumaraat
pl: E367, Fumaran wapnia
pt: E367, Fumarato de cálcio
ro: E367, Fumarat de calciu
sk: E367, Fumarát vápenatý
sl: E367, Kalcijev fumarat
sv: E367, Kalciumfumarat

en: E368, ammonium fumarate
xx: E368
bg: E368, Фумарат на амония
cs: E368, Fumarát amonný
da: E368, Ammoniumfumarat
de: E368, Ammoniumfumarat
el: E368, Φουμαρικό αμμώνιο
es: E368, Fumarato de amonio
et: E368, Ammooniumfumaraat
fi: E368, Ammoniumfumaraatti, ammoniumfumaraattia
fr: E368, Fumarate d'ammonium
hu: E368, Ammónium-fumarát
it: E368, Fumarato di ammonio
lt: E368, Ammonio fumaratas
lv: E368, Amonija fumarāts
mt: E368, Fumarat tal-ammonju
nl: E368, Ammoniumfumaraat
pl: E368, Fumaran amonu
pt: E368, Fumarato de amónio
ro: E368, Fumarat de amoniu
sk: E368, Fumarát amónny
sl: E368, Amonijev fumarat
sv: E368, Ammoniumfumarat

en: E370, 1\,4-Heptonolactone
xx: E370
ar: E370, 1,4-هبتونولاكتون
az: E370, 1,4-Heptonolakton
bg: E370, 1,4-Хептонолактон
ca: E370, 1,4-Heptonolactona
cs: E370, 1,4-Heptonolakton
da: E370, 1,4-Heptonolacton
de: E370, 1,4-Heptonolacton
el: E370, 1,4-Επτονολακτόνη
eo: E370, 1,4-Heptonolaktono
es: E370, 1,4-Heptonolactona
et: E370, 1,4-Heptonolaktoon
fi: E370, 1\,4-Heptonolaktoni, 1\,4-Heptonolaktonia
fr: E370, 4-Heptonolactone
hu: E370, 4-Heptonolaktonát
id: E370, 1,4-Heptonolakton
it: E370, 1,4-Eptonolattone
ja: E370, 1,4-ヘプタノラクトン
ko: E370, 1,4-헵톤락톤
lt: E370, 1,4-Heptonolaktonas
lv: E370, 1,4-Heptonolaktons
mk: E370, 1,4-Хептонолактон
mt: E370, 1,4-Eptonolakton
nl: E370, Delta-lacton
pl: E370, 1,4-Heptonolakton
pt: E370, 1,4-Heptonolactona
ro: E370, 1,4-Heptonolactonă
ru: E370, 1,4-Гептонолактон
sk: E370, 1,4-Heptonolaktón
sl: E370, 1,4-Heptonolakton
sr: E370, 1,4-Хептонолактон
sv: E370, 1,4-Heptonolakton
th: E370, 1,4-เฮปโทโนแลคโตน
tr: E370, 1,4-Heptonolakton
uk: E370, 1,4-Гептонолактон
vi: E370, 1,4-Heptonolactone
zh: E370, 1,4-庚内酯

en: E375, Nicotinic acid, Niacin, Nicotinamide
xx: E375, 3a314
bg: E375, Никотинова киселина, Ниацин, Никотинамид
cs: E375, Kyselina nikotinová, Niacin, Nikotinamid
da: E375, Nikotinsyre, Niacin, Nikotinamid
de: E375, Nikotinsäure, Niacin, Niacinamid, Nicotinamid, Nicotinsäureamid
el: E375, Νικοτινικό οξύ, Νιασίνη, Νικοτιναμίδη
es: E375, Ácido nicotínico, Niacina, Nicotinamida
et: E375, Nikotiinhape, Niasiin, Nikotinamiid
fi: E375, Nikotiinihappo, Niasiini, Nikotiiniamidi, Nikotiinihappoa, Niasiinia, Nikotiiniamidia, Nikotinamidi
fr: E375, Acide nicotinique, Niacine, Vitamine B3, Nicotinamide
hr: E375, Nikotinska kiselina, Niacin, Nikotinamid
hu: E375, Nikotinsav, Niacin, Nikotinamid
it: E375, Acido nicotinico, Niacina, Nicotinamide
lt: E375, Nikotino rūgštis, Niacinas, Nikotinamidas
lv: E375, Nikotīnskābe, Niacīns, Nikotīnamīds
mt: E375, Aċidu nikotiniku, Niacin, Nikotinamide
nl: E375, Nicotinezuur, Niacine, Vitamine B3, Nicotinamide
pl: E375, Kwas nikotynowy, Amid kwasu nikotynowego, Niacyna, Nikotynamid
pt: E375, Ácido nicotínico, Niacina, Nicotinamida
ro: E375, Acid nicotinic, Niacină, Nicotinamidă
sk: E375, Kyselina nikotínová, Niacín, Nikotínamid
sl: E375, Nikotinska kislina, Niacin, Nikotinamid
sv: E375, Nikotinsyra, Niacin, Nikotinamid

en: E380, Triammonium citrate
xx: E380
bg: E380, Триамониев цитрат
ca: E380, Citrat de triamoni
cs: E380, Citronan amonný
da: E380, Triammoniumcitrat
de: E380, Triammoniumcitrat
el: E380, Κιτρικο αμμωνιο
es: E380, Citrato triamónico
et: E380, Ammooniumtsitraat
fi: E380, Triammoniumsitraatti, Triammoniumsitraattia
fr: E380, Citrate de triammonium
hr: E380
hu: E380, Triammónium-citrát
it: E380, Citrato triammonico
lt: E380, Triamonio citratas
lv: E380, Triamonija citrāts
mt: E380, Ċitrat triammoniku
nl: E380, Triammoniumcitraat
pl: E380, Cytrynian triamonu
pt: E380, Citrato de triamónio
ro: E380, Citrat de triamoniu
sk: E380, Citran triamónny
sl: E380, Triamonijev citrat
sv: E380, Triammoniumcitrat

en: E381, ferric ammonium citrate, ammonium ferric citrate
xx: E381
bg: E381, Железен амониев цитрат
cs: E381, citrát železito-amonný
de: E381, Ammoniumeisen-III-citrat, Ammoniumeisenzitrat, Ammoniumeisencitrat, Ferriammoniumcitrat, Eisenammoniumcitrat
el: E381, εναμμώνιος κιτρικός σίδηρος
es: E381, citrato férrico de amonio
et: E381, raud-III-ammooniumtsitraat
fi: E381, Ammoniumrautasitraatti, Ammoniumrautasitraattia
fr: E381, citrate ferrique d’ammonium, Citrate d'ammonium ferrique vert, Citrate d'ammonium ferrique
hu: E381, vas-III-ammónium-citrát
it: E381, citrato ferrico di ammonio
lt: E381, geležies amonio citratas
lv: E381, dzelzs amonija citrāts
mt: E381, ċitrat ferriku tal-ammonju
nl: E381, ijzer-III-ammoniumcitraat
pl: E381, cytrynian amonu i żelaza-III
pt: E381, citrato férrico de amónio
ro: E381, citrat feric de amoniu
sk: E381, citran amónno-železitý
sl: E381, železov amonijev citrat
sv: E381, ferriammoniumcitrat

en: E383, calcium glycerophosphate
xx: E383
ar: E383, فوسفات غليسيريل الكالسيوم
bg: E383, Калциев глицерофосфат
cs: E383, glycerofosforečnan vápenatý
de: E383, Calciumglycerophosphat
el: E383, γλυκεροφωσφορικό ασβέστιο
es: E383, glicerofosfato de calcio
et: E383, kaltsiumglütserofosfaat
fi: E383, Kalsiumglyserofosfaatti, Kalsiumglyserofosfaattia
fr: E383, glycérophosphate de calcium
hu: E383, kalcium-glicerofoszfát
it: E383, glicerofosfato di calcio
lt: E383, kalcio glicerofosfatas
lv: E383, kalcija glicerofosfāts
mt: E383, gliċerofosfat tal-kalċju
nl: E383, calciumglycerofosfaat
pl: E383, glicerofosforan wapnia
pt: E383, glicerofosfato de cálcio
ro: E383, glicerofosfat de calciu
ru: E383, Глицерофосфат кальция
sh: E383, Kalcijum glicerilfosfat
sk: E383, glycerofosforečnan vápenatý
sl: E383, kalcijev glicerofosfat
sr: E383, Kalcijum glicerilfosfat
sv: E383, kalciumglycerolfosfat

en: E384, Isopropyl citrates
xx: E384
bg: E384, Цитрати на изопропил
cs: E384, Izopropyl citráty
da: E384, Isopropyl citrater
de: E384, Isopropylcitrate
el: E384, Ισοπροπυλικά κιτρικά άλατα
es: E384, Citratos de isopropilo
et: E384, Isopropüültsitraadid
fi: E384, Isopropyylisitraatit, Isopropyylisitraattia
fr: E384, Citrates d'isopropyle
hu: E384, Izopropil-citrátok
it: E384, Citrati di isopropile
lt: E384, Izopropilo citratai
lv: E384, Izopropilcitāti
mt: E384, Ċitrati ta' isopropil
nl: E384, Isopropylcitraten
pl: E384, Cytrany izopropylowe
pt: E384, Citratos de isopropilo
ro: E384, Citrați de izopropil
sk: E384, Izopropyl citráty
sl: E384, Izopropil citrati
sv: E384, Isopropylcitrat

en: E385, Calcium disodium ethylenediaminetetraacetate, Calcium disodium EDTA, Calcium disodium ethylene diamine tetra-acetate, calcium disodium EDTA, calcium-dinatrium-EDTA, Calcium disodium ethylenediaminetetraacetate, E-385, E 385
xx: E385
ar: E385, ثنائي صوديوم كالسيوم الإيديتات
bg: E385, Калциев динатриев етилен диамин тетраацетат, Калциев динатриев ЕДТА, Калциево динатриев етилендиамин тетрааацетат, EDTA
ca: E385, Etilendiaminotetracetat de calci i disodi, EDTA de calci i disodi, EDTA de calci i disòdic
cs: E385, Dvojsodnovápenatá sůl kyseliny diamintetraoctové
da: E385, Calciumdinatriumethylendiamintetraacetat, Calciumdinatrium-EDTA
de: E385, Calcium-dinatrium-ethylendiamintetraacetat, Calcium-Dinatrium-EDTA
el: E385, Αιθυλενοδιαμινοτετραοξικο ασβεστιονατριο
es: E385, Ácido etilendiaminotetraacético, EDTA, AEDT, Etilendiamino-tetracetato de calcio y disodio, EDTA disódico y cálcico, EDTA de calcio y disodio, ácido etilendiaminotetraacético
et: E385, Kaltsiumdinaatriumetüleendiamiintetraatsetaat, Kaltsiumdinaatrium-EDTA
fi: E385, Kalsiumdinatriumetyleenidiamiinitetra-asetaatti, Kalsiumdinatrium EDTA, Kalsiumdinatriumetyleenidiamiinitetra-asetaattia
fr: E385, Éthylène diamine tétra-acétate de calcium disodium, calcium disodium EDTA, CAS 662-33-9, EDTA calcio-disodique, Ethylène-diamine-tétra-acètate calcio-disodique, CAS 60-00-4, acide éthylene diamine tétra acétique, EDTA de calcium disodique, EDTA  , Éthylènediaminetétraacétate de calcium et de disodium
hr: E385, kalcijev dinatrijev etilendiamintetraacetat, kalcijev dinatrijev EDTA
hu: E385, Kalcium-dinátrium-etilén-diamin-tetraacetát, kálcium-dinátrium-EDTA, kalcium-dinátrium EDTA
id: E385, Natrium kalsium edetat
it: E385, Etilendiamminotetraacetato di calcio disodico, Calcio disodico EDTA
lt: E385, Kalcio dinatrio etilendiaminotetraacetatas, Kalcio dinatrio EDTA
lv: E385, Kalcija dinātrija etilēndiamīna tetraacetāts, Kalcija dinātrija EDTA
mt: E385, Etilendiammintetraaċetat disodiku tal-kalċju, EDTA disodiku tal-kalċju
nl: E385, Calciumdinatrium-ethyleendiaminetetraäcetaat, calciumdinatrium-EDTA, calciumdinatrium EDTA
or: E385, ସୋଡ଼ିଅମ କ୍ୟାଲସିଅମ ଏଡେଟେଟ
pl: E385, Sól wapniowo-disodowa kwasu etylenodiaminotetraoctowego, sól wapniowo-disodowa EDTA, EDTA
pt: E385, etilenodiaminotetracetato de cálcio dissódico, EDTA, EDTA de cálcio dissódico
ro: E385, Etilendiaminotetraacetat de calciu disodic, EDTA de calciu disodic, calciu disodic EDTA
ru: E385, Этилендиаминтетраацетат кальция-натрия
sk: E385, Etyléndiamíntetraacetát vápenato-disodný, Kalcium-dinátrium-EDTA
sl: E385, Kalcijev dinatrijev etilendiamintetra acetat, kalcijev dinatrijev EDTA
sv: E385, Kalciumdinatriumetylendiamintetraacetat, Kalciumdinatrium-EDTA
vi: E385, Natri canxi edetate
zh: E385, 鈉鈣乙二胺四乙酸

xx: E386
ar: E386, إي دي تي إيه ثنائي الصوديوم
az: E386, İki natrium EDTA
bg: E386, Динатриев ЕДТА
ca: E386, EDTA disòdic
cs: E386, Disodná sůl EDTA
da: E386, Dinatrium-EDTA
de: E386, Dinatrium-EDTA
el: E386, Δινάτριο EDTA
eo: E386, Dinatria EDTA
es: E386, EDTA disódico
et: E386, Dinaatrium-EDTA
fa: E386, دی سدیم ا د ت آ
fi: E386, Dinatrium EDTA
fr: E386, EDTA disodique, Disodium ethylenediamine tetra-acetate, Stabilisateurs synthétiques, Disodium édétate, sel de sodium de E385, sel de sodium d'E385
he: E386, EDTA דיסודיום
hi: E386, डिसोडियम ईडीटीए
hr: E386, Dinatrijev EDTA
hu: E386, Nátrium EDTA, Dinátrium EDTA
id: E386, Dinatrium EDTA
it: E386, EDTA disodico
ja: E386, EDTA二ナトリウム
ko: E386, 이나트륨 EDTA
lt: E386, Dinatrio EDTA
lv: E386, Dinātrija EDTA
mk: E386, Динатриум ЕДТА
mt: E386, EDTA Disodju
nl: E386, Natrium EDTA
pl: E386, Disodu EDTA
pt: E386, EDTA dissódico
ro: E386, EDTA disodic
ru: E386, Динатрия ЭДТА
sk: E386, Disodná soľ EDTA
sl: E386, Dinatrijev EDTA
sq: E386, EDTA disodium
sr: E386, Динатријум ЕДТА
sv: E386, Dinatrium EDTA
th: E386, ไดโซเดียม อีดีทีเอ
tr: E386, Disodyum EDTA
uk: E386, Динатрію ЕДТА
vi: E386, Dinatri EDTA
zh: E386, 乙二胺四乙酸二钠

xx: E387
fi: E387, Oksisteariini, Oksisteariinia
fr: E387, Oxystearin
hu: E387, Oxisztearin
nl: E387, Oxystearine

en: E388, Thiodipropionic acid
xx: E388
bg: E388, Тиодипропионова киселина
cs: E388, Thiodipropionová kyselina
da: E388, Thiodipropionsyre
de: E388, Thiodipropionsäure
el: E388, Θειοδιπροπιονικό οξύ
es: E388, Ácido tiodipropiónico
et: E388, Tiodipropioonhape
fi: E388, Tiodipropionihappo, Tiodipropionihappoa
fr: E388, Acide thiodipropanoïque, Antioxydant synthétique, Acide thiodipropionique, C6H10O4S
hu: E388, Tiódipropionsav
it: E388, Acido tiodipropionico
lt: E388, Tiopropiono rūgštis
lv: E388, Tiopropionskābe
mt: E388, Aċidu tiodipropjoniku
nl: E388, Thiodipropionzuur
pl: E388, Kwas tiodipropionowy
pt: E388, Ácido tiodipropiônico
ro: E388, Acid tiodipropionic
sk: E388, Thiodipropiónová kyselina
sl: E388, Tiopropionska kislina
sv: E388, Tiopropionsyra

xx: E389
fi: E389, Dilauryylitiodipropionaatti, Dilauryylitiodipropionaattia
fr: E389, Thiodipropionate de dilauryle